Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2085.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 27 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 67LEGIONNAIRES' DISEASE RISK MANAGEMENTSec.6701. Scope of chapter.6702. Definitions.6703. Duties of public water system.6704. Records of disruption.6705. Environmental rules and regulations.6706. Investigations of Legionnaires' disease.123456789101112131415161718 6707. Duties of building owners and operators.6708. Public awareness campaign and annual report.6709. Health rules and regulations.§ 6701. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to the testing for and mitigation of Legionella bacteria in public water systems by the department.§ 6702. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"De-identified data." Information that does not identify an individual, and for which there is no reasonable basis to believe that the information can be used to identify an individual, and which meets the requirements for de-identification of protected health information."Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Disruption of public water system." Any disruption that has the potential to lessen the quality of the water delivered, including the risk of exposure to pathogens such as Legionella bacteria. The term includes:(1) A change in the water treatment process.(2) An unplanned event that results in catastrophic issues that disrupt typical water system operations.(3) A change in source of the drinking water.(4) Any other conditions that the department finds may lead to a potential risk in the quality of water."Public water system." As defined in section 3 of the act of May 1, 1984 (P.L.206, No.43), known as the Pennsylvania Safe Drinking Water Act.20250HB2085PN2681 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 6703. Duties of public water system.(a) Minimum detectable disinfectant residual.--The owner or operator of a public water system which has more than 100 service connections and which is served fully or partially by surface water or groundwater under the influence of surface water, or any other public water system as determined by the department for the protection of public health, shall maintain:(1) For systems utilizing chlorine as a disinfectant, a minimum detectable disinfectant residual of at least 0.5 milligrams per liter of free chlorine in all active parts of the public water system at all times.(2) For systems utilizing chloramine as a disinfectant, a minimum detectable disinfectant residual of at least 1.0 milligrams per liter of monochloramine in all active parts of the public water system at all times.(b) Best management practices.--The department shall, within 12 months after the effective date of this subsection, develop and publish on its publicly accessible Internet website, best management practices for public water systems to discourage the growth and potential distribution of pathogens such as Legionella bacteria. The best management practices shall include information regarding:(1) Identification of areas of aging infrastructure, dead ends or components prone to biofilm accumulation.(2) Types of disruptions in the water distribution system.(3) Flushing details and schedules.(4) Disinfectant residual maintenance.(5) Storage tank maintenance.(6) Identification of areas of low water use, stagnation 20250HB2085PN2681 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or low pressure.(7) Monitoring and testing.(8) Water age management.(9) Use of nitrification action plans for chloraminated systems.(10) Other measures the department deems necessary for the optimization of water systems.(c) Distribution system maintenance plan.--No later than six months after the adoption and promulgation of rules and regulations by the department under section 6705 (relating to environmental rules and regulations), each public water system that is subject to the provisions of subsection (a) shall develop and implement a distribution system maintenance plan to comply with the provisions of this chapter in accordance with the best management practices developed under subsection (b) and any applicable rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department. The public water system shall annually submit to the department a statement certifying that the public water system has developed and implemented a distribution system maintenance plan under this subsection.§ 6704. Records of disruption.(a) Owner or operator of public water system.--(1) The owner or operator of a public water system that is subject to section 6703(a) (relating to duties of public water system) shall provide a record of a disruption of the public water system to the department via document upload or form submission to a data management system established by the department under subsection (b) within 72 hours of the occurrence of the disruption of the public water system.(2) The requirements of paragraph (1) shall not apply 20250HB2085PN2681 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 until the department has developed a data management system for the submission of records of disruption of public water systems.(b) Data management system.--No later than 24 months after the effective date of this subsection, the department shall establish a data management system for the receipt of records by a public water system of any disruption and, on its publicly accessible Internet website, a dashboard of publicly accessible and searchable records of disruptions of the public water system received by the department under this section.§ 6705. Environmental rules and regulations.(a) Adoption.--No later than 24 months after the effective date of this subsection, the department, in consultation with the Department of Health, shall adopt rules and promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this chapter.(b) Requirements.--The rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under subsection (a) shall establish requirements for public water systems with more than 100 service connections to discourage and minimize growth and potential distribution of pathogens such as Legionella bacteria in the water system and shall include:(1) Criteria to be used by public water systems to develop distribution system maintenance plans, including frequency of required disinfectant residual monitoring.(2) Requirements for a public water system to certify its distribution system maintenance plan and provide the plan to the department upon request.(3) Criteria for what would constitute a failure to comply with a distribution system maintenance plan.(4) Criteria for identifying disruptions of the public 20250HB2085PN2681 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 water system.(5) Requirements for customer notifications during times of increased risk of Legionella bacteria exposure, including a requirement to provide information about the risk of Legionella bacteria and measures consumers can take to reduce or eliminate exposure to Legionella bacteria.(6) Penalties for failure to maintain the minimum detectable disinfectant residual required under section 6703(a) (relating to duties of public water system), failure to comply with a certified distribution system maintenance plan, failure to comply with notification requirements or any other violations of this chapter.§ 6706. Investigations of Legionnaires' disease.(a) Requirement.--For each reported diagnosis of Legionnaires' disease in this Commonwealth, the Department of Health or a local health officer under subsection (c) shall conduct an epidemiological investigation to ascertain potential sources of infection consistent with the provisions of this section and the procedures and guidelines established under subsection (b).(b) Procedures and guidelines.--The Department of Health shall develop procedures and guidelines regarding suspected outbreaks of Legionnaires' disease under subsection (a), including:(1) Documentation of any disruption of the public water system serving the primary residence of the individual with a confirmed case of Legionnaires' disease or other water exposure points identified under paragraph (3).(2) Provisions for the investigation of potential sources of exposure to Legionella bacteria from fixtures, 20250HB2085PN2681 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 water-using equipment or features at the individual's residence, including water exposures external to the residence such as irrigation, hoses or water-based equipment and devices.(3) Provisions for the investigation of potential sources of exposure to Legionella bacteria from water exposure points in locations the individual visited in the 14 days preceding infection, if appropriate.(4) Procedures for determining when sampling of water fixtures identified as potential sources of exposure in paragraphs (2) and (3) shall be performed and procedures for performing the sampling.(c) Delegation of responsibilities.--The Department of Health may delegate its responsibilities and duties under this section as deemed appropriate for conducting all or part of the case investigation required by this section to a local health officer having jurisdiction over the locality in which a patient diagnosed with Legionnaires' disease lives, frequently visits or is employed, subject to the resources available to the local health officer.(d) Dashboard.--The Department of Health shall establish on its publicly accessible Internet website a dashboard accessible to the public and health care providers that provides de-identified data related to all reported cases of Legionnaires' disease, with the goal of providing near real-time incidence rates in affected communities. The Department of Health shall include information concerning aggregated data of all reported cases of Legionnaires' disease with the greatest degree of specificity consistent with ensuring that no information that could compromise protected health information or patient 20250HB2085PN2681 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 identity is included in the reporting.§ 6707. Duties of building owners and operators.(a) Water management program.--(1) No later than 24 months after the effective date of this paragraph, the owner or operator of a building or facility that meets the criteria provided in American Society of Heating, Refrigeration and Air Conditioning Engineers Standard 188-2021, Legionellosis: Risk Management for Building Water Systems in effect on the effective date of this paragraph shall implement a water management program to minimize the growth and transmission of Legionella bacteria in the building's water system, consistent with American Society of Heating, Refrigeration and Air Conditioning Engineers Standard 188-2021 and American Society of Heating, Refrigeration and Air Conditioning Engineers Guideline 12-2023, Managing the Risk of Legionellosis Associated with Building Water Systems in effect on the effective date of this paragraph.(2) The owner or operator of a facility or building required to implement a water management program under this section shall make the water management program available upon request to an employee of the department, the Department of Health or any other department or agency with license or inspection authority for the facility or building.(b) Fines.--The department, or any other department or agency with license or inspection authority for the facility or building, is authorized to impose fines on an owner or operator of a building that meets the criteria in American Society of Heating, Refrigeration and Air Conditioning Engineers Standard 188-2021 in effect on the effective date of this subsection for 20250HB2085PN2681 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 violations of this section consistent with existing fine structures, provided the owner or operator of a building is provided with due process and fair hearing rights.(c) Legionnaires' Disease Awareness Fund.--The Legionnaires' Disease Awareness Fund is established as a separate fund in the State Treasury. Money collected by the Commonwealth for violations of this chapter shall be deposited into the fund. Money in the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for the purposes of this chapter.(d) Water sampling and testing.--Water sampling and testing for bacteria conducted as part of a water management plan shall, at minimum, include testing for Legionella pneumophila and be conducted in a manner consistent with:(1) Rules, regulations and best practices developed by the Department of Health.(2) The American Society of Heating, Refrigeration and Air Conditioning Engineers Standard 188-2021 in effect on the effective date of this paragraph.§ 6708. Public awareness campaign and annual report.(a) Development.--The Department of Health, in consultation with the department, shall develop a public awareness campaign and targeted consumer education program to educate consumers, especially vulnerable populations, concerning the environmental sources of Legionella bacteria, the movement of Legionella bacteria through water distribution systems, the notification requirements of this chapter, how the requirements of this chapter impact consumers and the methods to control Legionella bacteria in an individual's home. The public awareness campaign and education program shall include information on the relationship between the risk of the proliferation of Legionella 20250HB2085PN2681 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 bacteria and hot water, the temperature requirements for medical devices, expansion tanks, hot tubs, whirlpools, spas, pools, air conditioning systems, ornamental fountains or other equipment or devices that release water aerosols in an individual's home or on an individual's property and the risk associated with the inhalation or aspiration by vulnerable populations of water droplets containing Legionella bacteria.(b) Report.--No later than one year after the effective date of this subsection and annually thereafter, the Department of Health, in consultation with the department, shall submit a report to the Governor and General Assembly, which shall include:(1) The number of cases of Legionnaires' disease in this Commonwealth reported in each of the previous 10 years.(2) The number of reported water sampling results in public water systems in the past year received by the department that indicate the presence of Legionella bacteria.(3) The number and type of violations of this chapter for which penalties were assessed.(4) Recommendations as to whether the minimum detectable disinfectant targets established under this chapter should be increased in order to minimize the growth and transmission of Legionella bacteria.(5) Any recommendations for legislative action as may be necessary to further control Legionella bacteria in the public water supply and affected homes and buildings.§ 6709. Health rules and regulations.No later than 24 months after the effective date of this section, the Department of Health, in consultation with the department, shall adopt rules and regulations to implement the 20250HB2085PN2681 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provisions of this chapter. The rules and regulations shall be consistent with the American Society of Heating, Refrigeration and Air Conditioning Engineers Standard 188-2021 in effect on the effective date of this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2085PN2681 - 11 - 12345